Hawaii statutes.
§201-82 Powers of the department.
The department, subject to the approval of the director of budget and finance,
shall have the following general powers to operate out-of-state offices
established:

(1) To enter into contracts, leases, or cooperative
agreements, or perform other transactions with any person, firm, partnership,
association, company, corporation, or foreign nation, as may be necessary in
the conduct of its business and on such terms as the department may deem
appropriate, using competitive procurement practices, to the extent
practicable, in accordance with rules adopted by the policy board;

(2) To establish operational bank accounts in
out-of-state locations, including foreign denomination accounts, as may be
necessary in the conduct of its business, notwithstanding the provisions of
chapter 38;

(3) To receive by gifts, grants, devises, bequests,
or otherwise from private sources or a foreign nation, any property, real,
personal, or mixed, intangible or tangible, absolutely or in trust, to be used
and disposed of, either the principal or the income therefrom, in accordance
with the conditions under which it was received;

(4) To sell, lease, rent, hold, maintain, use, and
operate any property, real, personal, or mixed, tangible or intangible, in
accordance with the conditions under which it was received;

(5) To hire such personnel as may be necessary in the
conduct of its business and on such terms as the department may deem
appropriate; and

(6) To do any or all other acts reasonably necessary
to carry out the objects and purposes of this part, provided that the
department shall not obligate any funds of the State not appropriated to the
department. [L 1988, c 366, pt of §1; am L Sp 1993, c 8, §17; am L 1997, c 352,
§23]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next